Utah statutes.
20A-14-101.   State Board of Education -- Number of members -- District
boundaries.
(1)  The State Board of Education shall consist of 15 members, with one member
to be elected from each State Board of Education district.
(2) (a)  The Legislature adopts the official census population figures and
maps of the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce
developed in connection with the taking of the 2000 national decennial census
as the official data for establishing state board district boundaries.
(b)  The numbers and boundaries of the state board districts are designated
and established by the maps attached to the bill that enacts this section.
